prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אבדו/D
אחזו/D
אכלו/D
אמצו/D
ארגן/D
ארגנו/D
בטחו/D
בערו/D
בצעו/D
בצרו/D
גדלו/D
גרדו/D
גרען/D
הבינו/D
הוכיחו/D
הכילו/D
העירו/D
הקדימו/D
השתחצן/D
התברגן/D
התחשבן/D
התכוונן/D
התעצבן/D
התפרסם/D
חלצו/D
חרפו/D
טהרו/D
כווננו/D
לחכו/D
לכדו/D
נטשו/D
נשכו/D
עוותו/D
עייפו/D
פצחו/D
פקדו/D
פשטו/D
צרפו/D
קבעו/D
קדמו/D
קומם/D
קמצו/D
שכנעו/D
שמחו/D
תחמו/D
תכנן/D
תכננו/D
